Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
Article 18
Judicial Circuits

Judicial Circuits

Until otherwise provided by the General Assembly, the Judicial Circuits shall be composed of the following counties:

First — Phillips, Lee, St. Francis, Prairie, Woodruff, White and Monroe. Second — Mississippi, Crittenden, Cross, Poinsett, Craighead, Greene, Clayton and Randolph. Third — Jackson, Independence, Lawrence, Sharp, Fulton, Izard, Stone and Baxter. Fourth — Marion, Boone, Searcy, Newton, Madison, Carroll, Benton and Washington. Fifth — Pope, Johnson, Franklin, Crawford, Sebastian, Sarber and Yell. Sixth — Lonoke, Pulaski, Van Buren and Faulkner. Seventh — Grant, Hot Springs, Garland, Perry, Saline and Conway. Eighth — Scott, Montgomery, Polk, Howard, Sevier, Little River, Pike and Clark. Ninth — Hempstead, Lafayette, Nevada, Columbia, Union, Ouachita and Calhoun. Tenth — Chicot, Drew, Ashley, Bradley, Dorsey and Dallas. Eleventh — Desha, Arkansas, Lincoln and Jefferson.

Terms of CourtsUntil otherwise provided by the General Assembly, the Circuit Courts shall be begun and held in the several counties as follows:

First Circuit

White — First Monday in February and August. Woodruff — Third Monday in February and August. Prairie — Second Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Monroe — Sixth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. St. Francis — Eighth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Lee — Tenth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Phillips — Twelfth Monday after the third Monday in February and August.

Second Circuit

Mississippi — First Monday in March and September. Crittenden — Second Monday in March and September. Cross — Second Monday after the second Monday in March and September. Poinsett — Third Monday after the second Monday in March and September. Craighead — Fourth Monday after the second Monday in March and September. Greene — Sixth Monday after the second Monday in March and September. Clayton — Seventh Monday after the second Monday in March and September. Randolph — Ninth Monday after the second Monday in March and September.

Third Circuit

Jackson — First Monday in March and September. Lawrence — Fourth Monday in March and September. Sharp — Second Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Fulton — Fourth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Baxter — Sixth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Izard — Seventh Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Stone — Ninth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Independence — Tenth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September.

Fourth Circuit

Marion — Second Monday in February and August. Boone — Third Monday in February and August. Searcy — Second Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Newton — Third Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Carroll — Fourth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Madison — Fifth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Benton — Sixth Monday after the third Monday in February and August. Washington — Eighth Monday after the third Monday in February and August.

Fifth Circuit

Greenwood District, Sebastian county — Third Monday in February and August. Fort Smith District, Sebastian county — First Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August. Crawford county — Fourth Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August. Franklin county — Sixth Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August. Sarber county — Eighth Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August. Yell county — Tenth Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August. Pope county — Twelfth Monday after fourth Monday in February and August. Johnson county — Fourteenth Monday after the fourth Monday in February and August.

Sixth Circuit

In the county of Pulaski on the first Monday in February, and continue twelve weeks if the business of said court require it. In the county of Lonoke on the first Monday succeeding the Pulaski Court, and continue two weeks if the business of said Court require it. In the county of Faulkner on the first Monday after the Lonoke Court, and continue two weeks if the business of said Court require it. In the county of Van Buren on the first Monday after the Faulkner Court, and continue two weeks if the business of said Court require it.

Fall Term, Sixth Circuit

In the county of Pulaski on the first Monday in October, and continue seven weeks if the business of said Court require it. In the county of Lonoke on the first Monday next after the Pulaski Court and continue two weeks if the business of said court require it. In the county of Faulkner on the first Monday after the Lonoke Court, and continue one week if the business of said Court require it. In the County of Van Buren on the first Monday after the Faulkner Court, and continue one week if the business of said Court require it.

Seventh Circuit

Hot Spring — Second Monday in March and September. Grant — Third Monday in March and September. Saline — Fourth Monday in March and September. Conway — Second Monday after fourth Monday in March and September. Perry — Fourth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. Garland — Fifth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September.

Eighth Circuit

Montgomery — First Monday in February and August. Scott — First Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Polk — Second Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Sevier — Third Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Little River — Fifth Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Howard — Seventh Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Pike — Eighth Monday after the first Monday in February and August. Clark — Ninth Monday after the first Monday in February and August.

Ninth Circuit

Calhoun — First Monday in March and September. Union — Second Monday after the first Monday in March and September. Columbia — Fourth Monday after the first Monday in March and September. Lafayette—Sixth Monday after the first Monday in March and September. Hempstead — Eighth Monday after the first Monday in March and September. Nevada — Eleventh Monday after the first Monday in March and September. Ouachita — Thirteenth Monday after the first Monday in March and September.

Tenth Circuit

Dorsey — Third Monday in February and August. Dallas — First Monday in March and September. Bradley — Second Monday in March and September. Ashley — Third Monday in March and September. Drew — Second Monday after the third Monday in March and September. Chicot — Fourth Monday after the third Monday in March and September.

Eleventh Circuit

In the county of Desha on the first Monday in March and September. In the county of Arkansas on the fourth Monday in March and September. In the county of Lincoln on the third Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September. In the county of Jefferson on the sixth Monday after the fourth Monday in March and September.

Publisher's Notes.

This article probably has been superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 80.

Cross References.

Circuit courts, §§ 16-13-101 et seq.